static/hunspell/05.11.2023/udm.aff
FLAG long
SFX Q1 0 -еозь [АЯОЁЫИЭЕӦӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -едозь [АЯОЁЫИЭЕӦӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -езозь [АЯОЁЫИЭЕӦӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -эозь [УЮ]
SFX Q1 0 -эдозь [УЮ]
SFX Q1 0 -эзозь [УЮ]
SFX Q1 0 -еозь [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГЖКМПРФХЦЧШЩӴӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -едозь [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГЖКМПРФХЦЧШЩӴӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -езозь [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГЖКМПРФХЦЧШЩӴӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -эозь [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][ТДСЗЛН]
SFX Q1 0 -эдозь [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][ТДСЗЛН]
SFX Q1 0 -эзозь [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][ТДСЗЛН]
SFX Q1 0 -еозь [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКМНПРТФХЦЧШЩӴӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -едозь [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКМНПРТФХЦЧШЩӴӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -езозь [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКМНПРТФХЦЧШЩӴӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -эозь [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][ЛНС]
SFX Q1 0 -эдозь [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][ЛНС]
SFX Q1 0 -эзозь [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][ЛНС]
SFX Q1 0 -ыз .
SFX Q1 0 -мы .
SFX Q1 0 -ды [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -зы [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -ды [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗЛМНРӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -зы [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗЛМНРӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -ды [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКЛМНРПТХЦЧШЩӴӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -зы [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКЛМНРПТХЦЧШЩӴӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -ты [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][ФС]
SFX Q1 0 -сы [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][ФС]
SFX Q1 0 -ты [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][КПТСФХЦЧЧШЩӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -сы [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][КПТСФХЦЧЧШЩӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ме .
SFX Q1 0 -дэ [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -дэс [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -зэ [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -зэс [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -дэ [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗЛМНРӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -дэс [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗЛМНРӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -зэ [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗЛМНРӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -зэс [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗЛМНРӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -дэ [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКЛМНРПТХЦЧШЩӴӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -дэс [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКЛМНРПТХЦЧШЩӴӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -зэ [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКЛМНРПТХЦЧШЩӴӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -зэс [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКЛМНРПТХЦЧШЩӴӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -тэ [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][ФС]
SFX Q1 0 -тэс [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][ФС]
SFX Q1 0 -сэ [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][ФС]
SFX Q1 0 -сэс [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][ФС]
SFX Q1 0 -тэ [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][КПТСФХЦЧЧШЩӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -тэс [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][КПТСФХЦЧЧШЩӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -сэ [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][КПТСФХЦЧЧШЩӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -сэс [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][КПТСФХЦЧЧШЩӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -лэн .
SFX Q1 0 -мылэн .
SFX Q1 0 -дылэн [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -зылэн [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -дылэн [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗЛМНРӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -зылэн [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗЛМНРӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -дылэн [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКЛМНРПТХЦЧШЩӴӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -зылэн [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКЛМНРПТХЦЧШЩӴӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -тылэн [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][ФС]
SFX Q1 0 -сылэн [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][ФС]
SFX Q1 0 -тылэн [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][КПТСФХЦЧЧШЩӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -сылэн [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][КПТСФХЦЧЧШЩӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -лэсь .
SFX Q1 0 -мылэсь .
SFX Q1 0 -дылэсь [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -зылэсь [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -дылэсь [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗЛМНРӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -зылэсь [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗЛМНРӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -дылэсь [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКЛМНРПТХЦЧШЩӴӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -зылэсь [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКЛМНРПТХЦЧШЩӴӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -тылэсь [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][ФС]
SFX Q1 0 -сылэсь [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][ФС]
SFX Q1 0 -тылэсь [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][КПТСФХЦЧЧШЩӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -сылэсь [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][КПТСФХЦЧЧШЩӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -лы .
SFX Q1 0 -мылы .
SFX Q1 0 -дылы [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -зылы [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -дылы [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗЛМНРӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -зылы [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗЛМНРӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -дылы [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКЛМНРПТХЦЧШЩӴӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -зылы [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКЛМНРПТХЦЧШЩӴӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -тылы [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][ФС]
SFX Q1 0 -сылы [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][ФС]
SFX Q1 0 -тылы [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][КПТСФХЦЧЧШЩӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -сылы [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][КПТСФХЦЧЧШЩӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -тэк .
SFX Q1 0 -мытэк .
SFX Q1 0 мытэк .
SFX Q1 0 -дытэк [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -зытэк [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -дытэк [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗЛМНРӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -зытэк [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗЛМНРӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -дытэк [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКЛМНРПТХЦЧШЩӴӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -зытэк [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКЛМНРПТХЦЧШЩӴӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -тытэк [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][ФС]
SFX Q1 0 -сытэк [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][ФС]
SFX Q1 0 -тытэк [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][КПТСФХЦЧЧШЩӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -сытэк [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][КПТСФХЦЧЧШЩӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -я .
SFX Q1 0 -мыя .
SFX Q1 0 -дыя [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -зыя [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -дыя [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗЛМНРӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -зыя [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗЛМНРӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -дыя [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКЛМНРПТХЦЧШЩӴӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -зыя [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКЛМНРПТХЦЧШЩӴӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -тыя [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][ФС]
SFX Q1 0 -сыя [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][ФС]
SFX Q1 0 -тыя [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][КПТСФХЦЧЧШЩӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -сыя [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][КПТСФХЦЧЧШЩӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ын .
SFX Q1 0 -ям [ЕЫАОЭЯИӦӤЁ]
SFX Q1 0 -ямы [ЕЫАОЭЯИӦӤЁ]
SFX Q1 0 -яд [ЕЫАОЭЯИӦӤЁ]
SFX Q1 0 -яды [ЕЫАОЭЯИӦӤЁ]
SFX Q1 0 -яз [ЕЫАОЭЯИӦӤЁ]
SFX Q1 0 -язы [ЕЫАОЭЯИӦӤЁ]
SFX Q1 0 -ам [^ЕЫАОЭЯИӦӤЁ]
SFX Q1 0 -амы [^ЕЫАОЭЯИӦӤЁ]
SFX Q1 0 -ад [^ЕЫАОЭЯИӦӤЁ]
SFX Q1 0 -ады [^ЕЫАОЭЯИӦӤЁ]
SFX Q1 0 -аз [^ЕЫАОЭЯИӦӤЁ]
SFX Q1 0 -азы [^ЕЫАОЭЯИӦӤЁ]
SFX Q1 0 -ысь .
SFX Q1 0 -ысьтым .
SFX Q1 0 -ысьтымы .
SFX Q1 0 -ысьтыд .
SFX Q1 0 -ысьтыды .
SFX Q1 0 -ысьтыз .
SFX Q1 0 -ысьтызы .
SFX Q1 0 -ысен .
SFX Q1 0 -ысеным .
SFX Q1 0 -ысеныд .
SFX Q1 0 -ысеныз .
SFX Q1 0 -мылань .
SFX Q1 0 -дылань [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -зылань [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -дылань [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗЛМНРӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -зылань [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗЛМНРӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -дылань [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКЛМНРПТХЦЧШЩӴӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -зылань [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКЛМНРПТХЦЧШЩӴӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -тылань [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][ФС]
SFX Q1 0 -сылань [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][ФС]
SFX Q1 0 -тылань [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][КПТСФХЦЧЧШЩӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -сылань [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][КПТСФХЦЧЧШЩӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -озь .
SFX Q1 0 -озям .
SFX Q1 0 -озяд .
SFX Q1 0 -озяз .
SFX Q1 0 -мыозь .
SFX Q1 0 -дыозь [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -зыозь [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -дыозь [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗЛМНРӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -зыозь [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗЛМНРӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -дыозь [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКЛМНРПТХЦЧШЩӴӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -зыозь [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][БВГДЖЗКЛМНРПТХЦЧШЩӴӞӜ]
SFX Q1 0 -тыозь [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][ФС]
SFX Q1 0 -сыозь [^ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][ФС]
SFX Q1 0 -тыозь [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][КПТСФХЦЧЧШЩӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -сыозь [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ][КПТСФХЦЧЧШЩӴ]
SFX Q1 0 -ос [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осы [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осыд [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осыз [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осмы [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осты [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -оссы [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осме [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осмес [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -остэ [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -остэс [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -оссэ [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -оссэс [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -ослэн [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осылэн [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осыдлэн [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осызлэн [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осмылэн [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -остылэн [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -оссылэн [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -ослэсь [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осылэсь [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осыдлэсь [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осызлэсь [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осмылэсь [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -остылэсь [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -оссылэсь [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -ослы [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осылы [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осыдлы [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осызлы [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осмылы [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -остылы [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -оссылы [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -остэк [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осытэк [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осыдтэк [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осызтэк [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осмытэк [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -остытэк [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -оссытэк [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осъя [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осыя [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осыдъя [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осызъя [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осмыя [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -остыя [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -оссыя [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осын [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осынлэсь [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осыным [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осынымы [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осыныд [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осыныды [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осыныз [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осынызы [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осам [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осамы [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осад [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осады [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осаз [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осазы [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осысь [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осысьтым [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осысьтымы [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осысьтыд [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осысьтыды [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осысьтыз [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осысьтызы [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осысен [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
SFX Q1 0 -осысеным [ӦОЁАЯУЮЕЭЫИӤ]
