static/hunspell/05.11.2023/udm.dic
Ⅱ/Q1
Ⅰ/Q1
Ⅳ/Q1
Ⅸ/Q1
№/Q1
'/Q1
%/Q1
Ⅷ/Q1
Ⅶ/Q1
Ⅵ/Q1
Ⅴ/Q1
Ⅻ/Q1
Ⅺ/Q1
Ⅹ/Q1
АвтоВАЗ/Q1
АГЗ/Q1
АЗС/Q1
АиФ/Q1
АК/Q1
АКБ/Q1
АККОР/Q1
АКМ/Q1
АКХ/Q1
АЛП/Q1
АН/Q1
АО/Q1
КО/Q1
ЕБН/Q1
СБС/Q1
ОНЭКСИМ/Q1
ПФГ/Q1
ТК/Q1
РНД/Q1
АОА/Q1
АОЗТ/Q1
АООТ/Q1
АӦШ/Q1
АПК/Q1
АПН/Q1
АПО/Q1
АССР/Q1
АТП/Q1
АТС/Q1
АФУН/Q1
АЧС/Q1
АЭС/Q1
БАД/Q1
БАТО/Q1
БелАЗ/Q1
БК/Q1
БМ/Q1
БМВ/Q1
БМД/Q1
БМП/Q1
БМПТ/Q1
БНК/Q1
БПЛА/Q1
БССР/Q1
БТИ/Q1
БТР/Q1
БХСС/Q1
БЧ/Q1
БЭП/Q1
ВАЗ/Q1
ВАК/Q1
ВАПП/Q1
ВВ/Q1
ВВП/Q1
ВВС/Q1
ВВХУ/Q1
ВГИК/Q1
ВГТРК/Q1
ВДВ/Q1
ВДК/Q1
ВДНХ/Q1
ВДПО/Q1
ВИА/Q1
ВиД/Q1
ВИП/Q1
ВИЧ/Q1
ВИЧ-СПИД/Q1
ВКП/Q1
ВКП(б)/Q1
ВЛКСМ/Q1
ВЛХИ/Q1
ВМС/Q1
ВМФ/Q1
ВНИГРИ/Q1
ВНИИ/Q1
ВНП/Q1
ВОИ/Q1
ВОКП/Q1
ВОКС/Q1
ВООПиКГ/Q1
ВОС/Q1
ВОХР/Q1
ВПК/Q1
ВПШ/Q1
ВСНХ/Q1
ВТО/Q1
ВТЭК/Q1
ВУАРП/Q1
ВЦИК/Q1
ВЦИОМ/Q1
ВЦСПС/Q1
ВЧК/Q1
ГАИ/Q1
ГВК/Q1
ГДР/Q1
ГИБДД/Q1
ГИЗ/Q1
ГИМС/Q1
ГИПУ/Q1
ГИТИС/Q1
ГК/Q1
ГКЗ/Q1
ГКО/Q1
ГКЧП/Q1
ГОВД/Q1
ГОСТ/Q1
ГОУДОД/Q1
ГОЧС/Q1
ГП/Q1
ГПМС/Q1
ГПТУ/Q1
ГПУ/Q1
ГРС/Q1
ГРЭС/Q1
ГСМ/Q1
ГТО/Q1
ГТП/Q1
ГТРК/Q1
ГУ/Q1
ГУГК/Q1
ГУЛАГ/Q1
ГУМ/Q1
ГУП/Q1
ГУФСИН/Q1
ГФО/Q1
ГФР/Q1
ГЭС/Q1
ГЭФ/Q1
ДВК/Q1
ДВП/Q1
ДДТ/Q1
ДЗОТ/Q1
ДК/Q1
ДКБ/Q1
ДНК/Q1
ДНР/Q1
ДНТ/Q1
ДОАО/Q1
ДОНО/Q1
ДОСААФ/Q1
ДОТ/Q1
ДПА/Q1
ДПК/Q1
ДПС/Q1
ДРСУ/Q1
ДСО/Q1
ДСП/Q1
ДСУ/Q1
ДТ/Q1
ДТП/Q1
ДЦП/Q1
ДЮКСШ/Q1
ДЮКФП/Q1
ДЮСШ/Q1
ЕАБЭР/Q1
ЕГЭ/Q1
ЕӦ/Q1
ЕСН/Q1
ЕТС/Q1
ЕЭЙ/Q1
ЕЭС/Q1
ЖКХ/Q1
ЖРП/Q1
ЖСК/Q1
ЖЭК/Q1
ЖЭУ/Q1
ЗАГС/Q1
ЗАО/Q1
ЗИЛ/Q1
ЗИС/Q1
ЗП/Q1
ЗПО/Q1
ИА/Q1
ИГМА/Q1
ИЖ/Q1
ИжГСХА/Q1
ИжГТУ/Q1
ИКК/Q1
ИКП/Q1
ИКТ/Q1
ИМБП/Q1
ИМКО/Q1
ИНИТИ/Q1
ИНН/Q1
ИНО/Q1
ИП/Q1
ИПОПАТ/Q1
ИРИСС/Q1
ИТАР-ТАСС/Q1
ИТК/Q1
ИТР/Q1
ИТФ/Q1
ИУУ/Q1
ИФУСКО/Q1
ИЧП/Q1
ИЭМЗ/Q1
ИЯЛИ/Q1
КазВО/Q1
КамАЗ/Q1
КАПП/Q1
КБ/Q1
КБО/Q1
КВН/Q1
КВСК/Q1
КВЧК/Q1
КГБ/Q1
КГПИ/Q1
КДН/Q1
КДУ/Q1
КДЮСШ/Q1
КЕБ/Q1
КЗК/Q1
КЗС/Q1
КИБО/Q1
КИМ/Q1
КИППТ/Q1
КИПТ/Q1
КИР/Q1
ККФУН/Q1
КЛИИ/Q1
КМА/Q1
КНДР/Q1
КНР/Q1
КНШ/Q1
КП/Q1
КПЗ/Q1
КПП/Q1
КПРФ/Q1
КПСС/Q1
КР/Q1
КРАГСиУ/Q1
КРБ/Q1
КРИРО/Q1
КРИРОиПК/Q1
КРТК/Q1
КРУ/Q1
КРФМЛИ/Q1
КРЦДОД/Q1
КС/Q1
КТД/Q1
КФК/Q1
КФХ/Q1
КЭС/Q1
КЭСК/Q1
ЛАП/Q1
ЛВЗ/Q1
ЛДК/Q1
ЛДПР/Q1
ЛЕФ/Q1
ЛЗП/Q1
ЛНР/Q1
ЛОИКФУН/Q1
ЛП/Q1
ЛПК/Q1
ЛПХ/Q1
ЛТО/Q1
ЛТП/Q1
ЛФК/Q1
ЛЭП/Q1
МАЗ/Q1
МАПП/Q1
МАФУН/Q1
МБВИ/Q1
МБТ/Q1
МВА/Q1
МВД/Q1
МВЕУ/Q1
МВт/Q1
МВТУ/Q1
МВФ/Q1
МВФСМВ/Q1
МГБ/Q1
МГУ/Q1
МЖК/Q1
МИИЗ/Q1
МКС/Q1
ММК/Q1
МММ/Q1
МОД/Q1
МОПР/Q1
МП/Q1
МПВО/Q1
МПС/Q1
МР/Q1
МРОТ/Q1
МСО/Q1
МСЭ/Q1
МТЗ/Q1
МТМ/Q1
МТО/Q1
МТП/Q1
МТС/Q1
МТФ/Q1
МУП/Q1
МФК/Q1
МФЦ/Q1
МХАТ/Q1
МЧС/Q1
МЮ/Q1
МЮД/Q1
НАК/Q1
НАТО/Q1
НВТ/Q1
НГДУ/Q1
НДР/Q1
НДС/Q1
НДФЛ/Q1
НЗ/Q1
НИИ/Q1
НИТИ/Q1
НКА/Q1
НКВД/Q1
НКГБ/Q1
НКО/Q1
НКП/Q1
НКПО/Q1
НЛО/Q1
НОТ/Q1
НП/Q1
НПО/Q1
НПФ/Q1
НСШ/Q1
НТВ/Q1
НХЛ/Q1
НЭП/Q1
НЮВ/Q1
ОАО/Q1
ОАР/Q1
ОАЭ/Q1
ОБДПС/Q1
ОБЖ/Q1
обик/Q1
ОбОНО/Q1
ОБСЕ/Q1
ОБХСС/Q1
ОВД/Q1
ӦВК/Q1
ОВР/Q1
ОГИБДД/Q1
ОГПУ/Q1
ОДКБ/Q1
ОЗУ/Q1
ӦКК/Q1
ОКРЗУ/Q1
ОМОН/Q1
ООН/Q1
ООО/Q1
ОП/Q1
ОПЕК/Q1
ОПК/Q1
ОПОП/Q1
ОПХ/Q1
ОРВИ/Q1
ОРЗ/Q1
ОРС/Q1
ОРТ/Q1
ОСБ/Q1
ОСВ/Q1
ОТК/Q1
ОТР/Q1
ОФП/Q1
ОЮВ/Q1
ПАЗ/Q1
ПАК/Q1
ПАСЕ/Q1
ПАСЗР/Q1
ПАТО/Q1
ПВО/Q1
ПВХ/Q1
ПДД/Q1
ПЗ/Q1
ПиМНО/Q1
ПМК/Q1
ПНШ/Q1
ПО/Q1
ППЖ/Q1
ППС/Q1
ППШ/Q1
ПриВО/Q1
ПРООН/Q1
ПСК/Q1
ПТР/Q1
ПТУ/Q1
ПУ/Q1
ПУОП/Q1
ПФ/Q1
ПФО/Q1
ПХД/Q1
ПЮВ/Q1
РАН/Q1
РАО/Q1
РАПО/Q1
РАПП/Q1
РАФУЖ/Q1
РБК/Q1
РВСН/Q1
РГУСП/Q1
РД/Q1
РДНТ/Q1
РДС/Q1
РенТВ/Q1
РКИ/Q1
РКП/Q1
РКШ/Q1
РОВД/Q1
РОӦ/Q1
РОСТО/Q1
РПСД/Q1
РССЖ/Q1
РСУ/Q1
РТО/Q1
РТР/Q1
РФ/Q1
РЭД/Q1
РЭУ/Q1
СанПиН/Q1
САСШ/Q1
СВ/Q1
СГУ/Q1
СДВ/Q1
СевПИНРО/Q1
СИЗО/Q1
СКА/Q1
СКМ/Q1
СКУ/Q1
СЛПК/Q1
СМИ/Q1
СМС/Q1
СНГ/Q1
СНК/Q1
СӦКЮ/Q1
СП/Q1
СПДУ/Q1
СПК/Q1
СПТУ/Q1
СРТО/Q1
ССП/Q1
ССРС/Q1
СТД/Q1
СТТ/Q1
СУРП/Q1
СХТ/Q1
СЧП/Q1
СыктГУ/Q1
СЭМПЛ/Q1
ТГК/Q1
ТМС/Q1
ТОО/Q1
ТОР-М1/Q1
ТОЦ/Q1
ТПП/Q1
ТРЦ/Q1
ТТ/Q1
ТЦ/Q1
ТЭЦ/Q1
УАМР/Q1
УБТ/Q1
УБЭП/Q1
УВС/Q1
УдАПП/Q1
УдНИИ/Q1
УЗИ/Q1
УИН/Q1
УКВ/Q1
УМВД/Q1
УМОПО/Q1
УНГС/Q1
УОНО/Q1
УПП/Q1
УРНУ/Q1
УРС/Q1
УСЗЧ/Q1
УТГУ/Q1
УФМС/Q1
УФСБ/Q1
УФСКН/Q1
УЭК/Q1
ФБР/Q1
ФГБУ/Q1
ФГУ/Q1
ФЗ/Q1
ФЗУ/Q1
ФК/Q1
ФНПР/Q1
ФОК/Q1
ФПК/Q1
ФРГ/Q1
ФСВ/Q1
ФСКА/Q1
ФСО/Q1
ФЭД/Q1
ХТЗ/Q1
ЦВР/Q1
ЦДНИ/Q1
ЦЕТЕТИС/Q1
ЦИК/Q1
ЦНДИ/Q1
ЦОМ/Q1
ЦРБ/Q1
ЦСКА/Q1
ЦСУ/Q1
ЦУМ/Q1
ЧИФ/Q1
ЧМЗ/Q1
ЧП/Q1
ЧС/Q1
ЭАМ/Q1
ЭГЗ/Q1
ЭМЗ/Q1
ЮАР/Q1
ЮДП/Q1
ЮМЗ/Q1
ЮНИСЕФ/Q1
ЮЭС/Q1
ВААП/Q1
ВОСВОД/Q1
ЕБРР/Q1
НК/Q1
ПВС/Q1
ТЕХНО/Q1
ЮКОС/Q1
АЗТ/Q1
ГубОНО/Q1
ОКХ/Q1
РВК/Q1
РУФПС/Q1
ШРМ/Q1
